Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 29 Mayhem

11-29-1.
Penalty for mutilation or disabling.

Every person who shall voluntarily, maliciously or of purpose put out an eye, slit the nose, ear, or lip, or cut off, bite off, or disable any limb or member of another, shall be imprisoned not exceeding twenty (20) years nor less than one year.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 277, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 343, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 395, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 606, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

11-29-1

; P.L. 1990, ch. 84, § 1.